test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s30x9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kippa: # 
    kippa+V+Inf: kippa
    kippa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [kippar, kippir]
    kippa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kippaði, kipti]
    kippa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [kippaðu, kiptu]
    kippa+V+Sup: [kippað, kipt]
    kippa+V+PrsPrf: [kippaður, kiptur]
